hr-HR: Klasifikacija veličine gola: Mini; Standardna; Za trening; Za mlade; Ostalo
pl: Klasyfikacja wielkości bramki: Mini; Regulaminowy; Treningowy; Młodzieżowy; Inny
es: Clasificación del tamaño del arco: Mini; Reglamentario; Entrenamiento; Juvenil; Otro
fi: Maalin kokoluokitus: Mini; Virallinen; Harjoittelu; Nuorten; Muu
ru: Классификация размера ворот: Мини; Стандартные; Тренировочные; Подростковые; Другое
cs: Klasifikace velikosti branky: Mini; Standardní; Tréninková; Mládežnická; Ostatní
zh-TW: 球門尺寸分類: 迷你; 正規標準; 訓練用; 青少年; 其他
el: Κατάταξη μεγέθους τέρματος: Mini; Επίσημο; Προπόνησης; Εφηβικό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Classificação do tamanho do gol: Mini; Oficial; Treino; Juvenil; Outro
de: Torgrößen-Klassifizierung: Mini; Regulär; Training; Jugend; Andere
da: Størrelsesklassificering for mål: Mini; Officiel størrelse; Træning; Junior; Anden
ko: 골대 크기 분류: 미니; 정규; 훈련용; 유스; 기타
pt-PT: Classificação do tamanho da baliza: Mini; Regulamentar; Treino; Juvenil; Outro
sv: Klassificering för målstorlek: Mini; Standard; Träning; Junior; Annan
nl: Maatklasse doel: Mini; Reglementair; Training; Jeugd; Anders
hu: Kapuméret besorolás: Mini; Szabványos; Edző; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
ro-RO: Clasificarea dimensiunii porții: Mini; Regulamentar; Antrenament; Tineret; Altele
zh-CN: 球门尺寸分类: 迷你; 标准; 训练; 青年; 其他
lt-LT: Vartų dydžio klasifikacija: Mini; Oficialaus dydžio; Treniruočių; Jaunuolių; Kita
tr: Kale boyut sınıfı: Mini; Nizami; Antrenman; Genç; Diğer
ja: ゴールサイズ分類: ミニ; 規定; トレーニング; ユース; その他
sk-SK: Klasifikácia veľkostí bránky: Mini; Predpisová; Tréningová; Mládežnícka; Iné
it: Classificazione della dimensione del goal: Mini; Regolamentare; Allenamento; Giovanile; Altro
sl-SI: Klasifikacija velikosti gola: Mini; Uradna velikost; Za trening; Za mlade; Drugo
bg-BG: Класификация на размера на вратата: Мини; Стандартна; Тренировъчна; Младежка; Друго
vi: Phân loại kích thước khung thành: Mini; Tiêu chuẩn; Tập luyện; Thiếu niên; Khác
en: Goal size classification: Mini; Regulation; Training; Youth; Other
nb: Klassifisering av målstørrelse: Mini; Standard; Trening; Ungdom; Annet
th: การจำแนกขนาดประตูฟุตบอล: มินิ; มาตรฐาน; สำหรับฝึกซ้อม; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
fr: Classification par taille des buts: Mini; Réglementaire; Entraînement; Junior; Autre